District of Columbia statutes.
5-802

Completion of disciplinary investigations.

The Metropolitan Police Department shall complete a disciplinary investigation, including issuing findings pursuant to the general orders, of a member regardless of whether that member resigns or retires while under investigation.

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 503, 47 DCR 4619